Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.395

Kip Tokuda memorial Washington civil liberties public education program—Intent.

The legislature intends to develop a grant program to fund public educational activities and development of educational materials to ensure that the events surrounding the exclusion, forced removal, and internment of civilians and permanent resident aliens of Japanese ancestry will be remembered, and so that the causes and circumstances of this and similar events may be illuminated and understood.

[ 2000 c 210 s 2.]